Washington statutes.
RCW 25.12.020

Of whom composed—Liability of members.

A limited partnership may consist of two or more persons, who are known and called general partners, and are jointly liable as general partners now are by law, and of two or more persons who shall contribute to the common stock a specific sum in actual money as capital, and are known and called special partners, and are not personally liable for any of the debts of the partnership, except as in this chapter specially provided.

[ 1955 c 15 s 25.12.020. Prior: 1927 c 106 s 1; 1869 p 380 s 2; RRS s 9967.]